Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.037

Publishing and dissemination costs—Deposit of proceeds.

The director may collect moneys to recover the reasonable costs of publishing and disseminating informational materials by the department. Materials may be disseminated in printed or electronic format. All moneys collected shall be deposited in the agricultural local fund or other appropriate fund administered by the director.

[ 1997 c 303 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—1997 c 303: See note following RCW 43.135.055.